District of Columbia statutes.
31-2231.02

General prohibition.

(a)

This chapter shall be construed to permit an administrative remedy only, and nothing in this chapter shall be construed to create or imply a private cause of action for a violation of this chapter.

(b)

This chapter shall not be construed to extinguish, limit, or otherwise impair any existing right in law or equity for conduct that is otherwise actionable.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-265, § 102, 48 DCR 1225
This section is referenced in § 31-2231.01.